hu: Műszempilla-ragasztó összetétele: Akrilát alapú; Cianoakrilát; Latex alapú; Latexmentes; Vízalapú; Egyéb
en: False eyelash adhesive formulation: Acrylate-based; Cyanoacrylate; Latex-based; Latex-free; Water-based; Other
ko: 인조 속눈썹 접착제 제형: 아크릴레이트 기반; 시아노아크릴레이트; 라텍스 기반; 라텍스 프리; 물 기반; 기타
tr: Takma kirpik yapıştırıcı formülasyonu: Akrilat bazlı; Siyanoakrilat; Lateks bazlı; Lateks içermez; Su bazlı; Diğer
el: Σύνθεση κόλλας ψεύτικων βλεφαρίδων: Με βάση το ακρυλικό; Κυανοακρυλική; Με βάση το λάτεξ; Χωρίς λάτεξ; Με βάση το νερό; Άλλο
de: Künstliche-Wimpern-Kleberformulierung: Auf Acrylatbasis; Cyanacrylat; Auf Latexbasis; Latexfrei; Auf Wasserbasis; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Formulação do adesivo de cílios postiços: À base de acrilato; Cianoacrilato; À base de látex; Sem látex; À base de água; Outro
sk-SK: Zloženie lepidla na umelé riasy: Na báze akrylátu; Kyanoakrylát; Na báze latexu; Bez latexu; Na vodnej báze; Iné
pt-PT: Formulação do adesivo para pestanas postiças: À base de acrilato; Cianoacrilato; À base de látex; Sem látex; À base de água; Outro
zh-CN: 假睫毛胶配方: 丙烯酸酯基; 氰基丙烯酸酯; 乳胶基; 不含乳胶; 水性; 其他
sv: Lösögonfranslimmets formulering: Akrylatbaserad; Cyanoakrylat; Latexbaserad; Latexfri; Vattenbaserad; Övrigt
it: Formulazione dell'adesivo per ciglia finte: A base di acrilato; Cianoacrilato; A base di lattice; Senza lattice; A base d'acqua; Altro
da: Formulering af lim til kunstige øjenvipper: Akrylatbaseret; Cyanoacrylat; Latexbaseret; Latex-fri; Vandbaseret; Andet
fi: Tekoripsiliiman koostumus: Akrylaattipohjainen; Syanoakrylaatti; Lateksipohjainen; Lateksiton; Vesipohjainen; Muu
vi: Công thức keo dán mi giả: Gốc acrylate; Cyanoacrylate; Gốc latex; Không chứa latex; Gốc nước; Khác
fr: Formule adhésive pour faux-cils: À base d'acrylate; Cyanoacrylate; À base de latex; Sans latex; À base d’eau; Autre
hr-HR: Formulacija ljepila za umjetne trepavice: Na bazi akrilata; Cijanoakrilat; Na bazi lateksa; Bez lateksa; Na bazi vode; Ostalo
nl: Nepwimperlijm formulering: Op acrylaatbasis; Cyanoacrylaat; Op latexbasis; Latexvrij; Op waterbasis; Andere
ro-RO: Formula adezivului pentru gene false: Pe bază de acrilat; Cianoacrilat; Pe bază de latex; Fără latex; Pe bază de apă; Altele
th: สูตรกาวขนตาปลอม: สูตรอะคริเลต; ไซยาโนอะคริเลต; สูตรลาเท็กซ์; ปราศจากยางธรรมชาติ; สูตรน้ำ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Formulacija lepila za umetne trepalnice: Na osnovi akrilata; Cianoakrilat; Na osnovi lateksa; Brez lateksa; Na vodni osnovi; Drugo
pl: Formuła kleju do sztucznych rzęs: Na bazie akrylanu; Cyjanoakrylan; Na bazie lateksu; Nie zawiera lateksu; Na bazie wody; Inne
cs: Složení lepidla na umělé řasy: Na bázi akrylátu; Kyanoakrylát; Na bázi latexu; Bez latexu; Na vodní bázi; Jiné
nb: Limformulering for falske øyevipper: Akrylatbasert; Cyanoakrylat; Lateksbasert; Uten lateks; Vannbasert; Annet
lt-LT: Dirbtinių blakstienų klijų formuluotė: Akrilatų pagrindu; Cianakrilatas; Latekso pagrindu; Be latekso; Vandens pagrindu; Kita
ru: Состав клея для накладных ресниц: На основе акрилата; Цианоакрилат; На основе латекса; Без латекса; На водной основе; Другой
ja: つけまつげ接着剤配合: アクリレート系; シアノアクリレート; ラテックス系; ラテックスフリー; 水性; その他
bg-BG: Формула на лепилото за изкуствени мигли: На акрилатна основа; Цианоакрилат; На латексова основа; Без латекс; На водна основа; Други
zh-TW: 假睫毛膠配方: 丙烯酸酯基; 氰基丙烯酸酯; 乳膠基; 不含乳膠; 水性; 其他
es: Formulación del adhesivo para pestañas postizas: Base de acrilato; Cianoacrilato; Base de látex; Sin látex; A base de agua; Otros